Massachusetts, session 194th, S1427.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 69 the following section:-
Section 70. No city or town shall enact an ordinance or by-law, or establish any policy,
that prohibits the wearing of face coverings for protective or medical use in any indoor or
outdoor space open to the public including, but not limited to:
Any publicly-owned facility;
Grocery stores, pharmacies, and other retail stores;
Public streets, parks, and ways; and
Any location, including hotels, event venues, and private clubs, that hosts indoor or
outdoor events or performances.
of 2

SECTION 2. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 31E the following section:-
Section 31F. No board of health shall adopt a regulation that prohibits the wearing of face
coverings for protective or medical use in any indoor or outdoor space open to the public
including, but not limited to:
Any publicly-owned facility;
Grocery stores, pharmacies, and other retail stores;
Public streets, parks, and ways; and
Any location, including hotels, event venues, and private clubs, that hosts indoor or
outdoor events or performances.
of 2